Vermont, session 2025-2026, H423.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. VERMONT AGRICULTURE AND FOOD SYSTEM STRATEGIC
PLAN; IMPLEMENTATION PROJECTS
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
VT LEG #379340 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.423
2025 Page 2 of 4
(1) The General Assembly directed the Vermont Sustainable Jobs Fund
in 10 V.S.A. § 330 to establish and administer the Vermont Farm-to-Plate
Investment Program to:
(A) increase sustainable economic development and create jobs in
Vermont’s food and farm sector;
(B) improve soils, water, and resiliency of the working landscape in
the face of climate change; and
(C) improve access to healthy local foods for all Vermonters.
(2) As part of the charge of the Vermont Farm-to-Plate Investment
Program, the Vermont Sustainable Jobs Fund was tasked with creating a
strategic plan for agricultural and food system development.
(3) The Vermont Sustainable Jobs Fund issued the Vermont Agriculture
and Food System Strategic Plan 2021 to 2030 (Strategic Plan) in 2020 to,
among other charges, stabilize and revitalize Vermont’s agricultural industry
and increase Vermont farm and food system resilience and security.
(4) With the information gathered from development of the Strategic
Plan, the Vermont Sustainable Jobs Fund is required to identify methods and
the funding necessary to strengthen the links among producers, processors, and
markets, including:
(A) supporting the work of the Working Lands Enterprise Board to
strategically invest in farm and food businesses;
VT LEG #379340 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.423
2025 Page 3 of 4
(B) collaborating with the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets
and the Department of Buildings and General Services to increase procurement
of local foods in accordance with 6 V.S.A. § 4601;
(C) collaborating with the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets
to increase procurement of local foods by businesses and institutions; and
(D) supporting initiatives that improve the marketing of foods from
Vermont producers to consumers inside the State and outside of the State.
(5) To achieve its goals and carry out its tasks, the Vermont Sustainable
Job Fund was authorized to:
(A) create an advisory panel with representatives from the
agricultural and business communities; and
(B) seek and accept funds from private and public entities.
(6) The Vermont Sustainable Jobs Fund has done exemplary work in the
development of the Strategic Plan and the identification and implementation of
projects under that Plan, but additional investment in the Strategic Plan is
needed to foster food security and resilience in the State in order to develop,
promote, and maintain healthy communities and ecosystems.
(b)(1) In addition to any other funds appropriated to the Agency of
Agriculture, Food and Markets in fiscal year 2026 for the Vermont Working
Lands Enterprise Board, $1,000,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets so that the Vermont Working
VT LEG #379340 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.423
2025 Page 4 of 4
Lands Enterprise Fund may issue grants to fund projects identified or proposed
in the Strategic Plan in order to foster food security and resilience and to
develop, promote, and maintain healthy communities and ecosystems.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379340 v.1